Oklahoma, session 2026, SB511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 42 O.S. 2021, Section 91A, as last


amended by Section 29, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (42 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 91A), is amended to read as follows:


Section 91A. A. 1. a. This section applies to all types of


personal property other than:


(1) farm equipment as defined in Section 91.2 of this


title, and


(2) “Section 91 Personal Property” as defined in


Section 91 of this title.



Req. No. 814 Page 1


b. This section applies to any vehicle, all-terrain


vehicle, utility vehicle, manufactured home,


motorcycle, boat, outboard motor, or trailer that is


excluded from coverage under subsection A of Section


of this title because the personal property:


(1) does not have a certificate of title,


(2) has a certificate of title but does not have an


active lien recorded on the certificate of title,


(3) has a certificate of title that is not issued by


Service Oklahoma or by a federally recognized


Indian tribe in the State of Oklahoma, or


(4) is otherwise excluded by subparagraph b of


paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 91 of this


title or subsection D of Section 91 of this


title.


c. If personal property has a certificate of title, or


would be required to have a certificate of title under


Oklahoma law, and is apparently covered both by this


section and by Sections 191 through 200 of this title,


the procedures set out in this section shall apply


instead of Sections 191 through 200 of this title. If


personal property without a certificate of title and


not required to be titled under Oklahoma law is


covered both by this section and Sections 191 through

Req. No. 814 Page 2


200 of this title, the procedures set out in Sections


191 through 200 of this title shall apply instead of


this section.


2. a. Any person who, while lawfully in possession of an


article of personal property to which this section


applies, renders any service to the owner thereof by


furnishing storage, rental space, material, labor or


skill for the protection, improvement, safekeeping,


towing, right to occupy space, storage or carriage


thereof, has a special lien thereon, dependent on


possession, for the compensation, if any, which is due


to such person from the owner for such service.


Charges owed under a contract primarily for the


purpose of storage or rental of space shall be accrued


only at the regular periodic rate for storage or


rental as provided in the contract, adjusted for


partial periods of storage or rental.


b. Except for Class AA licensed wrecker towing charges,


the special lien shall be subordinate to any perfected


security interest unless the claimant complies with


the requirements of this section. Failure to comply


with any requirements of this section shall result in


denial of any title application and cause the special


lien to be subordinate to any perfected lien. Upon

Req. No. 814 Page 3


such denial, the applicant shall be entitled to one


resubmission of the title application within thirty


(30) business days of receipt of the denial, and


proceed to comply with the requirements of this


section. In the event of a denial, the Notice of


Possessory Lien and the Notice of Sale may be mailed


on the same day in separate envelopes and storage


charges shall only be charged from the date of


resubmission; however, before a Notice of Sale is to


be mailed, the personal property must have been


possessed by the possessory lien claimant for at least


twenty-one (21) days. Furthermore, if the denial was


due to error by the party submitting the title


application, then no additional fee for the


resubmission shall be charged to the property owner.


(1) “Failure to comply” includes, but is not limited


to:


(1) (a) failure to timely provide additional


documentation supporting or verifying any


entry on submitted forms as requested by


Service Oklahoma,


(2) (b) failure to provide the documentation


supporting lawful possession as outlined in


paragraph 3 of subsection H of this section,

Req. No. 814 Page 4


(3) (c) claimant being other than the


individual who provided the service giving


rise to the special lien, as in subparagraph


a of this paragraph,


(4) (d) claimant not being in possession of


the vehicle, or


(5) (e) notification and proceedings not


accomplished in accordance with subparagraph


c of this paragraph, and paragraph 3 of this


subsection, and


(2) Failure to comply shall not include:


(a) clerical errors that do not affect or


reflect the true intent of the notice, or


(b) events out of the control of the claimant.


Such events may include, but not be limited


to, changes in ownership of the property or


interested party information while such


property is in the possession of the


claimant.


c. Any person claiming a lien under this section shall


request, within five (5) business days of performing


any service or work on the property, Service Oklahoma


or other appropriate license agency to furnish the


name and address of the current owner of and any

Req. No. 814 Page 5


lienholder upon the property. Service Oklahoma or an


appropriate license agency shall respond in person or


by mail to the lien claimant within ten (10) business


days of the receipt of the request for information.


Service Oklahoma shall render assistance to ascertain


ownership, if needed. The lien claimant shall send,


within seven (7) business days of receipt of the


requested information from Service Oklahoma or other


license agency, a notice of the location of the


property by certified mail with return receipt


requested, postage prepaid, to the owner and any


lienholder of the vehicle at the addresses furnished.


The lien claimant may charge not more than Fifty


Dollars ($50.00) for processing plus the cost of


postage if the notice is timely sent pursuant to the


requirements of this subparagraph in addition to fees


regulated by the Corporation Commission for licensed


wreckers. If the lien claimant is unable to meet the


time requirements due to a lack of or an altered


vehicle identification number on the property, the


lien claimant shall proceed diligently to obtain the


proper vehicle identification number and shall meet


the time requirements on the notice once the vehicle


identification number is known. If the lien claimant

Req. No. 814 Page 6


is required to send additional notices because of


change of ownership or lienholder after it has timely


complied with the requirements of this subparagraph,


the lien claimant shall remain in compliance if such


additional notices are sent within the required time


periods from the date of discovery of the new owners


or lienholders. The notice shall be in writing and


shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:


(1) a statement that the notice is a Notice of


Possessory Lien,


(2) the complete legal name, physical and mailing


address, and telephone number of the claimant,


(3) the complete legal name, physical and mailing


address of the person who requested that the


claimant render service to the owner by


furnishing material, labor or skill, storage, or


rental space, or the date the property was


abandoned if the claimant did not render any


other service,


(4) a description of the article of personal


property, and the complete physical and mailing


address of the location of the article of


personal property,



Req. No. 814 Page 7


(5) the nature of the work, labor or service


performed, material furnished, or the storage or


rental arrangement, and the date thereof, and


written proof of authority to perform the work,


labor or service provided that, in the case of a


law enforcement directed tow, the logbook entry


prescribed in OAC 595:25-5-5 or the tow ticket as


defined by the Corporation Commission shall serve


as written proof of authority,


(6) the signature of the claimant which shall be


notarized and, if applicable, the signature of


the claimant’s attorney. If the claimant is a


business, the name of the contact person


representing the business shall be shown. In


place of an original signature and notary seal, a


digital or electronic signature or seal shall be


accepted, and


(7) an itemized statement describing the date or


dates the labor or services were performed and


material furnished and the charges claimed for


each item, the totals of which shall equal the


total compensation claimed.


The lien claimant shall not be required to send the


notice required in this subparagraph if the property

Req. No. 814 Page 8


is released to an interested party before the notice


is mailed and no additional charges or fees continue


to accrue. If a law enforcement agency has the


property towed to a law enforcement facility, the


person claiming a lien under this section shall not be


required to send notice until the property is released


by law enforcement to the claimant or the date which


claimant starts charging storage, whichever is


earlier. A lien claimant shall have an extension of


ten (10) business days to send the notice required in


this subparagraph if a state of emergency has been


declared in the county in which the property is


located.


d. Subparagraphs b and c of this paragraph shall not


apply to salvage pools as defined in Section 591.2 of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. The lien may be foreclosed by a sale of such personal


property upon the notice and in the manner following: The notice


shall be in writing and shall contain, but not be limited to:


a. the names of the owner and any other known party or


parties who may claim any interest in the property,


b. a description of the property to be sold, including a


visual inspection or a photograph if the property is a



Req. No. 814 Page 9


motor vehicle, and the physical location of the


property,


c. the nature of the work, labor or service performed,


material furnished, or the storage or rental


arrangement, and the date thereof, and written proof


of authority to perform the work, labor or service


provided. In the case of a law enforcement directed


tow, the logbook entry prescribed in OAC 595:25-5-5 or


the tow ticket as defined by the Corporation


Commission, shall serve as written proof of authority,


d. the time and place of sale,


e. the name, telephone number, physical address and


mailing address of the claimant, and agent or


attorney, if any, foreclosing such lien. If the


claimant is a business, then the name of the contact


person representing the business must be shown. In


place of an original signature and notary seal, a


digital or electronic signature or seal shall be


accepted, and


f. itemized charges which shall equal the total


compensation claimed.


4. a. Such Notice of Sale shall be posted in two public


places in the county where the property is to be sold


at least ten (10) days before the time therein

Req. No. 814 Page 10


specified for such sale, and a copy of the notice


shall be mailed to the owner and any other party


claiming any interest in the property, if known, at


their last-known post office address, by certified


mail, return receipt requested, at least ten (10) days


before the time therein specified for such sale. If


the item of personal property is a manufactured home,


notice shall also be sent by certified mail to the


county treasurer and to the county assessor of the


county where the manufactured home is located.


b. In the case of any item of personal property without a


certificate of title and not required to be titled


under Oklahoma law, a party who claims any interest in


the property shall include all owners of the property;


any secured party who has an active financing


statement on file with the county clerk of Oklahoma


County listing one or more owners of the property by


legal name as debtors and indicating a collateral


description that would include the property; and any


other person having any interest in the personal


property, of whom the claimant has actual notice.


c. In the case of personal property subject to this


section for which a certificate of title has been


issued by any jurisdiction, a party who claims any

Req. No. 814 Page 11


interest in the property shall include all owners of


the article of personal property as indicated by the


certificate of title; lien debtors, if any, other than


the owners; any lienholder whose lien is noted on the


face of the certificate of title; and any other person


having any interest in the article of personal


property, of whom the claimant has actual notice.


d. When the jurisdiction of titling for a vehicle, all-


terrain vehicle, motorcycle, boat, outboard motor, or


trailer that is five (5) model years old or newer, or


a manufactured home that is fifteen (15) model years


old or newer, cannot be determined by ordinary means,


the claimant, the agent of the claimant, or the


attorney of the claimant, shall request, in writing,


that Service Oklahoma ascertain the jurisdiction where


the vehicle or manufactured home is titled. Service


Oklahoma shall, within fourteen (14) days from the


date the request is received, provide information as


to the jurisdiction where the personal property is


titled. If Service Oklahoma is unable to provide the


information, it shall provide notice that the record


is not available.


e. When personal property is of a type that Oklahoma law


requires to be titled, the owner of record of that

Req. No. 814 Page 12


property is unknown, and the jurisdiction of titling


and owner of record cannot be determined by ordinary


means and also, if applicable, cannot be determined in


accordance with the preceding subparagraph, then the


special lien may be foreclosed by publication of a


legal notice in a legal newspaper in the county where


the personal property is located, as defined in


Section 106 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Such notice shall include the description of the


property by year, make, vehicle identification number


if available from the property, the name of the


individual who may be contacted for information, and


the telephone number of that person or the address


where the vehicle is located. The legal notice shall


be published once per week for three (3) consecutive


weeks. As soon as circumstances exist as described in


the first sentence of this subparagraph, the first


date of publication may occur even if the special lien


has not accrued for over thirty (30) days. The first


date available for public sale of the vehicle is the


day following publication of the final notice, but no


fewer than thirty (30) days after the lien has


accrued. When the owner of record is unknown, the


Notice of Sale nevertheless must be completed and

Req. No. 814 Page 13


mailed to any known interested party by certified


mail. For purposes of this paragraph, interested


parties shall include all persons described in


subparagraph b or subparagraph c of this paragraph,


whichever is applicable, with the exception of any


owner who is unknown. Except in circumstances


described in paragraph 7 of this subsection that


provide for a shorter time period, the Notice of Sale


shall be posted in two public places in the county


where the property is to be sold at least ten (10)


days before the time therein specified for such sale,


and the Notice of Sale shall not be mailed until at


least thirty (30) days after the lien has accrued.


5. The lienor or any other person may in good faith become a


purchaser of the property sold.


6. Proceedings for foreclosure under this act shall commence in


twenty (20) days after the lien has accrued, except as provided


elsewhere in Oklahoma law.


7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, proceedings for


foreclosures for the storage of junk vehicles towed and stored


pursuant to Section 955 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes by


Class AA wreckers listed with the Motor Vehicle Division of the


Department of Public Safety, may be commenced five (5) days after


the lien has accrued. For purposes of this paragraph, “junk

Req. No. 814 Page 14


vehicles” means any vehicle that is more than ten (10) years old if


the cost of a comparable vehicle would be less than Three Hundred


Dollars ($300.00) as quoted in the latest edition of the National


Automobile Dealers Association Official Used Car Guide or latest


monthly edition of any other nationally recognized published


guidebook, adjusting to the condition of the vehicle.


B. 1. a. Any person who is induced by means of a check or other


form of written order for immediate payment of money


to deliver up possession of an article of personal


property on which the person has a special lien


created by subsection A of this section, which check


or other written order is dishonored, or is not paid


when presented, shall have a lien for the amount


thereof upon the personal property.


b. The person claiming such lien shall, within thirty


(30) days from the date of dishonor of the check or


other written order for payment of money, file in the


office of the county clerk of the county in which the


property is situated a sworn statement that:


(1) the check or other written order for immediate


payment of money, copy thereof being attached,


was received for labor, material or supplies for


producing or repairing an article of personal



Req. No. 814 Page 15


property, or for other specific property-related


services covered by this section,


(2) the check or other written order was not paid,


and


(3) the uttering of the check or other written order


constituted the means for inducing the person,


one possessed of a special lien created by


subsection A of this section upon the described


article of personal property, to deliver up the


article of personal property.


2. a. Any person who renders service to the owner of an


article of personal property by furnishing storage,


rental space, material, labor, or skill for the


protection, improvement, safekeeping, towing, right to


occupy space, storage, or carriage thereof shall have


a special lien on such property pursuant to this


section if such property is removed from the person’s


possession, without such person’s written consent or


without payment for such service.


b. The person claiming such lien shall, within five (5)


days of such nonauthorized removal, file in the office


of the county clerk of the county in which the


property is located, a sworn statement including:



Req. No. 814 Page 16


(1) that services were rendered on or in relation to


the article of personal property by the person


claiming such lien,


(2) that the property was in the possession of the


person claiming the lien but such property was


removed without his or her written consent,


(3) an identifying description of the article of


personal property on or in relation to which the


service was rendered, and


(4) that the debt for the services rendered on or in


relation to the article of personal property was


not paid. Provided, if the unpaid total amount


of the debt for services rendered on or in


relation to the article of personal property is


unknown, an approximated amount of the debt due


and owing shall be included in the sworn


statement but such approximated debt may be


amended within thirty (30) days of such filing to


reflect the actual amount of the debt due and


owing.


3. The enforcement of the lien shall be within sixty (60) days


after filing the lien in the manner provided by law for enforcing


the lien of a security agreement and provided that the lien shall



Req. No. 814 Page 17


not affect the rights of innocent, intervening purchasers without


notice.


C. If the person who renders service to the owner of an article


of personal property to which this section applies relinquishes or


loses possession of the article due to circumstances described in


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 or subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of


subsection B of this section, the person claiming the lien shall be


entitled to possession of the article until the amount due is paid,


unless the article is possessed by a person who became a bona fide


purchaser. Entitlement to possession shall be in accordance with


the following:


1. The claimant may take possession of an article pursuant to


this subsection only if the person obligated under the contract for


services has signed an acknowledgment of receipt of a notice that


the article may be subject to repossession. The notice and


acknowledgment pursuant to this subsection shall be:


a. in writing and separate from the written contract for


services, or


b. printed on the written contract for services, credit


agreement or other document which displays the notice


in bold-faced, capitalized and underlined type, or is


separated from surrounding written material so as to


be conspicuous with a separate signature line;



Req. No. 814 Page 18


2. The claimant may require the person obligated under the


contract for services to pay the costs of repossession as a


condition for reclaiming the article only to the extent of the


reasonable fair market value of the services required to take


possession of the article;


3. The claimant shall not transfer to a third party or to a


person who performs repossession services, a check, money order, or


credit card transaction that is received as payment for services


with respect to an article and that is returned to the claimant


because of insufficient funds or no funds, because the person


writing the check, issuing the money order, or credit cardholder has


no account or because the check, money order, or credit card account


has been closed. A person violating this paragraph shall be guilty


of a misdemeanor; and


4. An article that is repossessed pursuant to this subsection


shall be promptly delivered to the location where the services were


performed. The article shall remain at the services location at all


times until the article is lawfully returned to the record owner or


a lienholder or is disposed of pursuant to this section.


D. 1. This section applies if a vehicle, all-terrain vehicle,


manufactured home, motorcycle, boat, outboard motor, or trailer has


a certificate of title issued by Service Oklahoma or by a federally


recognized Indian tribe in Oklahoma, but there is no active lien


recorded on the certificate of title.

Req. No. 814 Page 19


2. This section applies if a vehicle, all-terrain vehicle,


utility vehicle, motorcycle, boat, outboard motor or trailer has a


certificate of title issued by Service Oklahoma or by a federally


recognized Indian tribe in Oklahoma, and there is an active lien


recorded on the certificate of title, but the lien is over fifteen


(15) years old.


3. This section applies if personal property to which Section


of this title otherwise would apply has been registered by


Service Oklahoma or by a federally recognized Indian tribe in the


State of Oklahoma, and there is a lien of record but no certificate


of title has been issued.


4. This section applies if personal property to which Section


of this title otherwise would apply has not been registered by


either Service Oklahoma or a federally recognized Indian tribe in


the State of Oklahoma, and no certificate of title has been issued,


but there is a lien of record.


5. This section applies to personal property that otherwise


would be covered by Section 91 of this title, except that the


services were rendered or the property was abandoned prior to


November 1, 2005.


6. This section applies to a vehicle, all-terrain vehicle,


utility vehicle, manufactured home, motorcycle, boat, outboard


motor, or trailer for which ownership cannot be determined by


ordinary means or by Service Oklahoma Motor Vehicle Division, as

Req. No. 814 Page 20


provided in subparagraphs d and e of paragraph 4 of subsection A of


this section, as applicable.


7. This section applies to items of personal property that are


not required by Oklahoma law to be titled, and that do not have a


certificate of title.


8. This section applies to salvage pools as defined in Section


591.2 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


9. This section applies to class AA licensed wrecker services


taking possession of a vehicle pursuant to an agreement with, or at


the direction of, or dispatched by a state or local law enforcement


or government agency, or pursuant to the abandoned vehicle removal


provisions of Section 954A of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes with


respect to all types of personal property, regardless of whether


that personal property has a certificate of title.


10. For a vehicle abandoned at a salvage pool, if the cost of


repairing the vehicle for safe operation on the highway does not


exceed sixty percent (60%) of the fair market value of the vehicle


as defined in Section 1111 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, a


salvage title shall not be required.


E. A person who knowingly makes a false statement of a material


fact regarding the furnishing of storage, rental space, material,


labor or skill for the protection, improvement, safekeeping, towing,


right to occupy space, storage or carriage thereof in a proceeding


under this section, or attempts to use or uses the provisions of

Req. No. 814 Page 21


this section to foreclose an owner or lienholder’s interest in a


vehicle knowing that any of the statements made in the proceeding


are false, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a felony.


F. Upon receipt of notice of legal proceedings, Service


Oklahoma shall cause the sale process to be put on hold until notice


of resolution of court proceedings is received from the court. If


such notice of commencement of court proceedings is not filed with


Service Oklahoma, the possessory lien sale process may continue.


G. No possessory lien sale shall be held on a Sunday.


H. For purposes of this section:


1. “Possession” includes actual possession and constructive


possession;


2. “Constructive possession” means possession by a person who,


although not in actual possession, does not have an intention to


abandon property, knowingly has both power and the intention at a


given time to exercise dominion or control over the property, and


who holds claim to such thing by virtue of some legal right;


3. “Lawfully in possession” means a person has documentation


from the owner or the owner’s authorized agent, or an insurance


company or its authorized agent, authorizing the furnishing of


material, labor or storage, or that the property was authorized to


be towed to a repair facility.


Class AA wrecker services taking possession of a vehicle


pursuant to an agreement with, or at the direction of, or dispatched

Req. No. 814 Page 22


by, a state or local law enforcement or government agency, or


pursuant to the abandoned vehicle removal provisions of Section 954A


of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall be considered lawfully


in possession of the vehicle. If the person lacks such


documentation, the procedures established by this section shall not


apply; and


4. “Itemized charges” means total parts, total labor, total


towing fees, total storage fees, total processing fees and totals of


any other fee groups, the sum total of which shall equal the


compensation claimed.


I. For purposes of this section, the United States Postal


Service approved electronic equivalent of proof of return receipt


requested Form 3811 shall satisfy return receipt requested


documentation requirements.


J. If a person claiming a special lien pursuant to this section


fails to comply with any of the requirements of this section, any


interested party may proceed against the person claiming such lien


for all damages arising therefrom, including conversion, if the


article of personal property has been sold. If the notice or


notices required by this section shall be shown to be knowingly


false or fraudulent, the interested party shall be entitled to


treble damages. The prevailing party shall be entitled to all


costs, including reasonable attorney fees.



Req. No. 814 Page 23


K. Any interested party shall be permitted to visually inspect


and verify the services rendered by the claimant prior to the sale


of the article of property during normal business hours. If the


claimant fails to allow any interested party to inspect the


property, the interested party shall mail a request for inspection


by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the claimant.


Within three (3) business days of receipt of the request for


inspection, the claimant shall mail a photograph of the property, by


certified mail, return receipt requested, and a date of inspection


within five (5) business days from the date of the notice to


inspect. The lienholder shall be allowed to retrieve the property


without being required to bring the title into the lienholder’s


name, if the lienholder provides proof it is a lienholder and any


payment due the claimant for lawful charges where the claimant has


complied with this section. Upon the release of personal property


to an insurer or representative of the insurer, wrecker operators


shall be exempt from all liability and shall be held harmless for


any losses or claims of loss. In the event any law enforcement


agency places a hold on the property, the party wanting to inspect


or photograph the property shall obtain permission from the law


enforcement agency that placed the hold on the property before


inspecting or photographing.


L. This section shall apply to all actions or proceedings that


commence on or after August 22, 2014.

Req. No. 814 Page 24


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-814 TEK 1/19/2025 5:37:48 AM











































Req. No. 814 Page 25